Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6176YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2574 Section 1. Section 907.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (17) The defendant was a public employee 3 or public official at the time of the offense and the amount 4 taken by the defendant from the public employer exceeded ten 5 thousand dollars. 6 Sec. 2. Section 907.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, 7 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The defendant was a public employee 9 or public official at the time of the offense and the amount 10 taken by the defendant from the public employer exceeded ten 11 thousand dollars. 12 Sec. 3. Section 907.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. The sentence of a defendant who was a 15 public employee or public official at the time of the offense 16 and the amount taken by the defendant from the public employer 17 exceeded ten thousand dollars unless the defendant establishes, 18 by clear and convincing evidence, and the sentencing court 19 finds and states specifically on the record, the existence 20 of mitigating circumstances warranting a departure from the 21 otherwise applicable mandatory term of incarceration. 22 Sec. 4. Section 907.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 23 following new subsection: 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. For the purposes of this section: 25 a. âPublic employeeâ means any individual employed by a 26 public employer and includes a contractor or vendor. 27 b. âPublic employerâ means the state, its boards, 28 commissions, agencies, and departments, and its political 29 subdivisions including school districts and other special 30 purpose districts. 31 c. âPublic officialâ means the same as defined in section 32 68B.2. 33